Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201275-502
Pipeline carriers;
powers.

Pipeline carriers which are declared common carriers under section 75-501,
pipeline carriers approved under the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, and pipeline
carriers for which the Governor approves a route under section 57-1503 may
store, transport, or convey any liquid or gas, or the products thereof, and
make reasonable charges therefor, may lay down, construct, maintain, and operate
pipelines, tanks, pump stations, connections, fixtures, storage plants, and
such machinery, apparatus, devices, and arrangement as may be necessary to
operate such pipes or pipelines between different points in this state, and
may use and occupy such lands, rights-of-way, easements, franchises, buildings,
and structures as may be necessary to construct and maintain them.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. V, § 2, p. 1416;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 98;

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 20.
November 23, 2011
Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, see section 57-1401.